Maryland, session 2025, SB0796.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–410.
(a) (1) (i) The Department may allow a person to hunt on each Sunday of
the game bird and game mammal seasons in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Calvert
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
3. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Caroline
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
4. Cecil County;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0796*

SENATE BILL 796
5. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Charles
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
6. [Subject to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph,]
Dorchester County[, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.];
7. Garrett County;
8. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Queen
Anne’s County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
9. St. Mary’s County;
10. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
11. Washington County;
12. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
13. Subject to subparagraph [(v)] (IV) of this paragraph,
Wicomico County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 and 12 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)2, 3, 5, and 8 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday during the deer firearms season;
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November during the deer bow hunting season; and
3. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.
(iv) [The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)6 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from the first
Sunday in October through the second Sunday in January, inclusive; and

SENATE BILL 796 3
2. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.
(v)] The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)(13) of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.